Massachusetts, session 194th, H1731.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 258C of the General Laws, as most recently amended by Section
109 of Chapter 256 of the Acts of 2010, is hereby amended by inserting after the second sentence
in section 2 (b), the following sentence:
In the case of a claimant who was sexually abused as a minor, such good cause shall
include the report of a duly licensed mental health professional stating an opinion that the
claimant did not make the connection between the sexual abuse and the harm suffered by the
claimant at the time the abuse occurred, and that claimant's failure to make the connection was
consistent with the typical responses by such victims of childhood sexual abuse.
SECTION 2. Chapter 258C of the General Laws, as most recently amended by Section
127 of Chapter 176 of the Acts of 2008, is hereby amended by inserting after section 5 (a) (1) the
following:
of 2

In the case of a claimant who was sexually abused as a minor, said three years shall
commence to run when the claimant first makes the connection between the sexual abuse and the
harm suffered by the claimant as a result. The report of a duly licensed mental health
professional stating an opinion as to the date when the claimant first made the connection
between the sexual abuse and the harm suffered by the claimant, and that the claimant's failure to
make the connection prior to that date was consistent with the typical responses by such victims
of childhood sexual abuse, shall be prima facie evidence in all proceedings under this chapter.
of 2